Massachusetts, session 194th, H3404.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 2 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2018 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding after Section 64 the following section:
Section 65. Freshwater fish of the Commonwealth
The Eastern Brook Trout shall be the official freshwater fish of the commonwealth.
of 1